Missouri, session 2026, HB2224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 186, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 186.090, to read as follows:
186.090. 1. There is hereby established the "Missouri Advisory Boards and
Commissions Association". The association shall be open to former members of the
general assembly and current and former members of Missouri's advisory boards and
commissions, board of curators, and regents. The association shall meet on at least an
annual basis, determine association membership guidelines, develop a set of bylaws, and
issue annual reports and other reports as requested by the general assembly and the
executive branch.
2. The association shall report recommendations for further action as requested
to the general assembly and the offices of the governor and lieutenant governor.
3. Membership in the Missouri advisory boards and commissions association
shall be voluntary and members shall serve without compensation.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.